District of Columbia statutes.
47-4619

Abatement of real property taxes for the temporary Walker Jones/Northwest One Unity Health Center.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, the term “Unity Health Center” means the portion of the real property described as Lot 253, Square 672, in use by Unity Health Care, Inc., as the Walker Jones/Northwest One Unity Health Center.

(b)

The real property taxes imposed by Chapter 8 of this title on the Unity Health Center shall be abated for the period of October 1, 2009 to September 30, 2013.

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-351, § 2, 56 DCR 1113
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 126, 59 DCR 6190
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 validated a previously made technical correction.
Section 3 of D.C. Law 17-351 provided that this act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.